Nevada, session 83, AB114.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 244A.601 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
244A.601 1. In any county whose population is 100,000 or
more, and less than 700,000, the county fair and recreation board
consists of nine members who are appointed as follows:
(a) One member by the board of county commissioners.
(b) One member by the governing body of the largest
incorporated city in the county.
(c) One member by the governing body of the next largest
incorporated city in the county.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, six members
by the members [appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c).]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
of the board. The members [entitled] appointed pursuant to [vote
shall select:] this paragraph must include:
(1) One member who is a representative of air service
interests from a list of nominees submitted by the airport authority
of the county. The nominees must not be elected officers.
(2) One member who is a representative of interests relating
to tourism or other commercial interests or the resort hotel business
from a list of nominees submitted by the chamber of commerce of
the largest incorporated city in the county.
(3) One member who is a representative of other business or
commercial interests, including gaming establishments, from a list
of nominees submitted by a visitor’s bureau, other than a county fair
and recreation board or a bureau created by such a board, that is
authorized by law to receive a portion of the tax on transient
lodging, if any. If no such bureau exists in the county, the
nominations must be made by the chamber of commerce of the third
largest township in the county.
(4) Three members who are representatives of the association
of gaming establishments whose membership collectively paid the
most gross revenue fees to the State pursuant to NRS 463.370 in the
county in the preceding year, from a list of nominees submitted by
the association. If there is no such association, the three appointed
members must be representative of gaming.
 If the members [entitled to vote] of the board find the nominees
on a list of nominees submitted pursuant to this paragraph
unacceptable, they shall request a new list of nominees.
2. The members of the board shall elect a Chair from among
[the] its members . [appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c)
of subsection 1.]
3. The terms of members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (a),
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 are coterminous with their terms of
office. The members appointed pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 must be appointed for 2-year terms. Any vacancy
occurring on the board must be filled by the authority entitled to
appoint the member whose position is vacant. Each member
appointed pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 may succeed
himself or herself only once.
4. If a member ceases to be engaged in the business or
occupation which he or she was appointed to represent, he or she
ceases to be a member, and another person engaged in that business
or occupation must be appointed for the unexpired term.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
5. Any member appointed by the board of county
commissioners or a governing body of a city must be a member of
the appointing board or body.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)